Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.310

Deposit of securities.

A savings bank may deposit securities owned by it, for safekeeping, with any duly designated depositary for the bank's funds. The written statement of the depositary that it holds for safekeeping specified securities of a savings bank may be taken as evidence of the facts therein shown by any public officer or any officer of the bank or committee of its trustees whose duty it is to examine the affairs and assets of the bank.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.20.310. Prior: 1929 c 74 s 24; 1927 c 184 s 4; RRS s 3381-24.]